src/fst/affixes/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
LEXICON yii-a-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;  


!
! yi-PROG
!
LEXICON yi-PROG
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yi@                   yi-PROG-AFF ;

LEXICON yi-PROG-AFF
@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@                          yi-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                    yi-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                   yi-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                    yi-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.S@@D.PREFIX@                           yis-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     yis-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    yis-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     yis-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.I@@D.PREFIX@                           yii-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     yii-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    yii-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     yii-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON yi-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #; 

LEXICON yi-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
! After the transitional/semelfactive/inchoative prefix ì- (represented in
! the model as "^L", here captured by the flag LOWTONE), 3SG, 3PL, and 4SG
! yi-PROG have the form yi-, not a-, after an inner prefix (e.g., màgúdìyilòł
! "he/she/it is getting sick", not *màgúdalòł; cf. also tayidìyiʔół "he/she/it
! is lifting it up, holding it up")
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@R.LOWTONE.ON@yi         #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@D.LOWTONE@á             #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@R.LOWTONE.ON@yi         #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@D.LOWTONE@á             #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@R.LOWTONE.ON@yi         #;  
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@D.LOWTONE@á             #;  

LEXICON yi-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #; 


LEXICON yis-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix
! TODO: 3S form needs to be verified (e.g., O yáswush or O yiswùsh?)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yás   #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ás    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ás    #;

LEXICON yis-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
! After inner-prefix ì- ("^L", LOWTONE), 3SG/3PL/4SG yis-PROG has the form
! form yis-, not ás- (e.g., tayidìyistáł "he/she/it is lifting it up, holding
! it up (human/animal object).
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@R.LOWTONE.ON@yis        #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@D.LOWTONE@ás            #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@R.LOWTONE.ON@yis        #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@D.LOWTONE@ás            #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@R.LOWTONE.ON@yis        #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@D.LOWTONE@ás            #;

LEXICON yis-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ás    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ás    #;


LEXICON yii-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;

LEXICON yii-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
! After inner-prefix ì- ("^L", LOWTONE), 3SG/3PL/4SG yii-PROG is expected to
! have the form yii-, not áá-.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@R.LOWTONE.ON@yii        #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@D.LOWTONE@áá            #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@R.LOWTONE.ON@yii        #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@D.LOWTONE@áá            #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@R.LOWTONE.ON@yii        #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@D.LOWTONE@áá            #;

LEXICON yii-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;


!
! yi-POT
!
LEXICON yi-POT
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yi@                    yi-POT-AFF ;

LEXICON yi-POT-AFF
@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@                          yi-POT-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                    yi-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                   yi-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                    yi-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.S@@D.PREFIX@                           yis-POT-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     yis-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    yis-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     yis-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.I@@D.PREFIX@                           yii-POT-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     yii-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    yii-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     yii-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON yi-POT-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@í     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;

LEXICON yi-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix
! Two 1SG forms are attested after inner prefixes: (di)yis- and (d)ís (e.g.,
! diyishò ~ díshò "I might go")
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@í     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;

LEXICON yi-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@í     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;


LEXICON yis-POT-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ís    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;

LEXICON yis-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix
! Two 1SG forms are attested after inner prefixes: (di)yis- and (d)ís.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ís    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;
